Washington statutes.
RCW 11.48.150

Several personal representatives considered as one.

In an action against several personal representatives, they shall all be considered as one person representing their testator or intestate, and judgment may be given and execution issued against all of them who are defendants in the action.

[ 1965 c 145 s 11.48.150. Prior: Code 1881 s 719; 1877 p 146 s 723; 1869 p 165 s 660; RRS s 968.]